Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB451.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 63 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3108.1. Amnesty for disciplinary actions regarding COVID-19 protocols.A license, registration, certificate or permit that was suspended or revoked or a disciplinary action taken by a licensing board or licensing commission on a licensee, registrant, certificate holder or permit holder for failure to comply with any of the following during the period in which the Governor's Proclamation of Disaster Emergency issued on March 6, 2020, published at 50 Pa.B. 1644 (March 21, 2020) was in effect shall be reinstated or removed:123456789101112131415161718 (1) A proclamation or order of the Governor under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301(f)(7) (relating to general authority of Governor), s ection 8(a) of the act of April 27, 1905 (P.L.312, No.218), entitled "An act creating a Department of Health, and defining its powers and duties," section 2102(a) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, or section 5 of the act of April 23, 1956 (1955 P.L.1510, No.500), known as the Disease Prevention and Control Law of 1955, which relates to the novel coronavirus known as "COVID-19."(2) An order of the Secretary of Health under s ection 8(a) of the act of April 27, 1905 (P.L.312, No.218), entitled "An act creating a Department of Health, and defining its powers and duties," section 2102(a) or 2106 of The Administrative Code of 1929, section 5 of the Disease Prevention and Control Law of 1955 or 28 Pa. Code § 27.60 (relating to disease control measures), 27.61 (relating to isolation), 27.65 (relating to quarantine), 27.66 (relating to placarding), 27.67 (relating to movement of persons and animals subject to isolation or quarantine by action of a local health authority or the Department) or 27.68 (relating to release from isolation or quarantine), which relates to the novel coronavirus known as "COVID-19."(3) Guidance issued by the Department of Health or the Department of Human Services relating to the novel coronavirus known as "COVID-19."Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0451PN0428 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627